fi: Hiusvärin koostumus: Valkaisuaine; Väriä jättävä naamio; Puolipysyvä; Hapete; Kiiltävä; Raitapakkaus; Vaalennusaine; Pysyvä; Peroksidi; Tyvivärjäys; Puolipermanentti; Väliaikainen; Väriaine; Muu
zh-CN: 染发配方: 漂白剂; 补色发膜; 半永久性; 显色剂; 亮光; 挑染套装; 漂浅剂; 永久性; 双氧水; 补染发根; 半永久性; 临时用; 爽肤水; 其他
ja: ヘアカラー配合: 漂白剤; カラーデポジットマスク; デミパーマネント; デベロッパー; グロス; ハイライトキット; ライトナー; 取り外し不可; 過酸化水素; ルートタッチアップ; セミパーマネント; 一時的; トナー; その他
vi: Công thức màu tóc: Thuốc tẩy; Mặt nạ nhuộm màu; Bán vĩnh viễn; Chất oxy hóa; Bóng; Bộ làm sáng tóc; Thuốc làm sáng; Vĩnh viễn; Peroxide; Nhuộm phủ chân tóc; Tạm thời lâu; Tạm thời; Toner; Khác
lt-LT: Plaukų dažų formuluotė: Baliklis; Spalvą suteikianti kaukė; Pusiau ilgalaikė; Aktyvatorius; Blizgus; Sruogų dažymo rinkinys; Šviesintojas; Įmontuoti; Peroksidas; Šaknų retušavimas; Pusiau permanentinė; Nuimamas; Tonikas; Kita
da: Hårfarveformulering: Blegemiddel; Farveaflejringsmaske; Demi-permanent; Udvikler; Glans; Highlightsæt; Lysningsmiddel; Permanent; Peroxid; Rodfarvning; Semi-permanent; Midlertidig; Toner; Andet
es: Formulación del color del cabello: Lejía; Mascarilla con depósito de color; Semipermanente; Oxidante; Brillo; Kit de mechas; Aclarante; Permanente; Peróxido; Retoque de raíces; Semi-permanente; Temporal; Tonificante; Otros
nb: Hårfargeformulering: Blekemiddel; Fargeavleirende maske; Demi-permanent; Fremkaller; Gloss; Highlightingsett; Lysningsprodukt; Permanent; Peroksid; Etterbehandling av røtter; Semi-permanent; Midlertidig; Toner; Annet
ko: 헤어 컬러 제형: 표백제; 컬러 침착 마스크; 반영구; 디벨로퍼; 글로스; 하이라이팅 키트; 라이트너; 영구; 과산화물; 뿌리 터치업; 준영구; 일시적인; 토너; 기타
en: Hair color formulation: Bleach; Color depositing mask; Demi-permanent; Developer; Gloss; Highlighting kit; Lightener; Permanent; Peroxide; Root touch-up; Semi-permanent; Temporary; Toner; Other
sl-SI: Formulacija barve za lase: Beljenje; Maska za dodajanje barve; Poltrajna; Razvijalec; Sijaj; Komplet za posvetljevanje; Posvetljevalec; Trajna; Peroksid; Popravilo narastka; Polpermanentna; Začasna; Toner; Drugo
zh-TW: 染髮配方: 漂白水; 補色髮膜; 護髮染; 顯色劑; 亮彩唇蜜; 挑染組合; 褪色劑; 永久型; 雙氧水; 補根劑; 半永久染; 暫時; 化妝水; 其他
it: Formulazione del colore per capelli: Candeggina; Maschera colorante; Demi-permanente; Ossidante; Lucido; Kit per mèches; Schiarente; Permanenti; Perossido; Ritocco radici; Semi-permanente; Temporaneo; Toner; Altro
pt-PT: Formulação de cor de cabelo: Lixívia; Máscara depositante de cor; Semipermanente; Revelador; Brilhante; Kit de madeixas; Clarificante; Permanente; Peróxido; Retoque de raízes; Semipermanente; Temporário; Toner; Outro
nl: Haarkleurformulering: Bleek; Kleurafgevend masker; Demi-permanent; Ontwikkelaar; Glans; Highlight kit; Ontkleuringsmiddel; Permanent; Peroxide; Uitgroei bijwerking; Semi-permanent; Tijdelijk; Toner; Andere
ro-RO: Formulare culoare păr: Înălbitor; Mască cu depunere de culoare; Demi-permanent; Oxidant; Lucios; Kit șuvițe; Decolorant; Permanentă; Peroxid; Retuș rădăcini; Semi-permanent; Temporară; Tonic; Altele
pt-BR: Formulação de cor de cabelo: Água sanitária; Máscara com depósito de cor; Semipermanente; Oxidante; Gloss; Kit de mechas; Clareador; Permanente; Peróxido; Retoque de raiz; Semipermanente; Temporário; Toner; Outro
bg-BG: Формула на боята за коса: Белина; Маска за отлагане на цвят; Полутраен; Проявител; Гланц; Комплект за кичури; Изсветлител; Постоянно; Пероксид; Коригиране на корени; Полуперманентен; Временно; Тонер; Други
fr: Formulation de la coloration capillaire: Eau de Javel; Masque colorant déposant; Demi-permanent; Oxydant; Brillant; Kit de mèches; Éclaircissant; Permanent; Peroxyde; Retouche racines; Semi-permanent; Temporaire; Tonifiant; Autre
de: Haarfarbformulierung: Bleichmittel; Farbauffrischende Maske; Demi-permanent; Entwickler; Glänzend; Strähnchen-Set; Aufheller; Permanent; Peroxid; Ansatz-Nachfärbung; Semi-permanent; Vorübergehend; Toner; Sonstiges
ru: Формула краски для волос: Отбеливатели; Тонирующая маска; Деми-перманентная; Окислитель; Глянцевый; Набор для мелирования; Осветлитель; Постоянный; Перекись; Подкрашивание корней; Полуперманентная; Временный; Тонер; Другой
pl: Formuła farby do włosów: Wybielacze; Maska koloryzująca; Półtrwały; Utleniacz; Połysk; Zestaw do pasemek; Rozjaśniacz; Stała; Woda utleniona; Tuszowanie odrostów; Półtrwały; Tymczasowa; Toner; Inne
el: Σύνθεση βαφής μαλλιών: Χλωρίνη; Μάσκα απόθεσης χρώματος; Ημιμόνιμη; Οξειδωτικό; Λάμψη; Κιτ ανταυγειών; Ξανοιχτικό; Μόνιμο; Υπεροξείδιο; Ρετούς ρίζας; Ημιπερμανέντ; Προσωρινός; Τονωτική λοσιόν; Άλλο
th: สูตรสีผม: สารฟอกขาว; มาสก์เติมสีผม; เดมิ-เพอร์มาเนนท์; ดีเวลลอปเปอร์; วาว; ชุดไฮไลท์; ไลท์เทนเนอร์; ถาวร; เปอร์ออกไซด์; เติมรากผม; กึ่งถาวร; ชั่วคราว; โทนเนอร์; อื่นๆ
sv: Hårfärgsformulering: Blekmedel; Färggivande mask; Semipermanent; Utvecklare; Glans; Slingkit; Ljusgörare; Permanent; Peroxid; Rotretuschering; Semipermanent; Temporär; Toner; Övrigt
cs: Složení barvy na vlasy: Bělení; Barvicí maska; Demi-permanentní; Vývojka; Lesk; Sada na melírování; Zesvětlovač; Permanentní; Peroxid; Přelakování odrostů; Semi-permanentní; Dočasné; Toner; Jiné
hu: Hajszínkészítmény: Fehérítő; Színező maszk; Féltartós; Fejlesztő; Fényes; Melírozó készlet; Világosító; Állandó; Peroxid; Lenövés fedő; Féltartós színező; Ideiglenes; Tonik; Egyéb
hr-HR: Formulacija boje za kosu: Izbjeljivač; Maska za nanošenje boje; Polutrajna; Razvijavač; Sjajni; Set za pramenove; Posvetljivač; Trajno; Peroksid; Prekrivanje korijena; Polupermanentna; Privremeni; Tonik; Ostalo
sk-SK: Zloženie farby na vlasy: Bielidlo; Farebná maska; Demi-permanentná; Vývojka; Lesklý; Sada na melírovanie; Zosvetľovač; Trvalý; Peroxid; Prekrytie odrastov; Semi-permanentná; Dočasný; Toner; Iné
tr: Saç rengi formülasyonu: Çamaşır Suyu; Renk veren maske; Yarı kalıcı; Oksidan; Parlak; Röfle seti; Açıcı; Kalıcı; Peroksit; Dip rötuşu; Yarı kalıcı; Geçici; Toner; Diğer